test/src/morphology/N-kooj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kǭj: # Noun 123 'eng /est lusikas/fin' - full paradigm
     kǭj+N+Sg+Nom: kǭj
     kǭj+N+Sg+Gen: kǭj
     kǭj+N+Sg+Par: kǭjõ
     kǭj+N+Sg+Dat: kǭjõn
     kǭj+N+Sg+Ins: kǭjõks
     kǭj+N+Sg+Ill: kǭjõ
     kǭj+N+Sg+Ela: kǭjstõ
     kǭj+N+Pl+Nom: kǭjd
     kǭj+N+Pl+Gen: kǭjd
     kǭj+N+Pl+Par: kǭjḑi
     kǭj+N+Pl+Dat: kǭjdõn
     kǭj+N+Pl+Ins: kǭjdkõks
     kǭj+N+Pl+Ill: kǭjži
     kǭj+N+Pl+Ela: kǭjšti
